Maine, session 132, LD679.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
COMMUNITY COLLEGE SYSTEM, BOARD OF TRUSTEES OF THE MAINE
Live Fire Service Training Facilities Fund Z269
Initiative: Provides one-time funds for the Maine Fire Service Institute to provide funds for
the construction and repair or replacement of regional live fire service training facilities in
the State awarded by the Maine Fire Protection Services Commission for fiscal year 2026-
27 only.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $500,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $500,000
Page 1 - 132LR1607(05)